sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör för 3D-skrivare > Rengöringsenheter för 3D-skrivare: 3D-skrivarrengöringsfilament; 3D-skrivarrengöringsvätskor och -sprayer; Rengöringsverktygssatser för 3D-skrivare
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 3D 印表機配件 > 3D 印表機清潔工具包: 3D 印表機清潔細絲; 3D 印表機清潔液及噴霧; 3D 印表機清潔工具套組
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do drukarek 3D > Zestawy do czyszczenia drukarek 3D: Filament czyszczący do drukarki 3D; Płyny czyszczące i sprzę do drukarki 3D; Zestawy narzędzi do czyszczenia drukarki 3D
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > 3D Yazıcı Aksesuarları > 3D Yazıcı Temizleme Setleri: 3D Yazıcı Temizleme Filamentleri; 3D Yazıcı Temizleme Sıvıları ve Spreyleri; 3D Yazıcı Temizleme Araç Kitleri
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ 3D > ชุดทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D: ฟิลาเมนต์ทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; น้ำยาและสเปรย์ทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D; ชุดเครื่องมือทำความสะอาดเครื่องพิมพ์ 3D
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za 3D pisače > Kompleti za čišćenje 3D pisača: Filamenti za čišćenje 3D pisača; Tekućine i sprejevi za čišćenje 3D pisača; Kompleti alata za čišćenje 3D pisača
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > 3D spausdintuvų priedai > 3D spausdintuvų valymo rinkiniai: 3D spausdintuvo valymo gijos; 3D spausdintuvo valymo skysčiai ir purškalai; 3D spausdintuvo valymo įrankių rinkiniai
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora 3D > Kits de limpeza para impressora 3D: Filamentos de limpeza de impressora 3D; Fluidos e sprays de limpeza de impressora 3D; Kit de ferramentas de limpeza de impressora 3D
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > 3D-Drucker-Zubehör > Reinigungskits für 3D-Drucker: 3D-Drucker-Reinigungsfilamente; 3D-Drucker-Reinigungsflüssigkeiten und -Sprays; 3D-Drucker-Reinigungswerkzeugsätze
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > 3D-skrivertilbehør > Rengjøringssett til 3D-skrivere: Rengjøringsfilament til 3D-skrivere; Rengjøringsvæsker og -sprayer til 3D-skrivere; Rengjøringsverktøysett til 3D-skrivere
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios para impressoras 3D > Kits de limpeza para impressoras 3D: Filamentos de limpeza para impressora 3D; Fluidos e sprays de limpeza para impressora 3D; Kit de ferramentas de limpeza para impressora 3D
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes 3D > Kits de nettoyage pour imprimante 3D: Filaments de nettoyage pour imprimante 3D; Fluides et sprays de nettoyage pour imprimante 3D; Kits d’outils de nettoyage pour imprimante 3D
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за 3D принтер > Комплекти за почистване на 3D принтер: Почистващи филаменти за 3D принтер; Почистващи течности и спрейове за 3D принтер; Комплекти инструменти за почистване на 3D принтер
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > 3D Printer Accessories > 3D Printer Cleaning Kits: 3D Printer Cleaning Filaments; 3D Printer Cleaning Fluids & Sprays; 3D Printer Cleaning Tool Kits
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in 3D > Bộ dụng cụ vệ sinh máy in 3D: Filament làm sạch máy in 3D; Chất lỏng và xịt làm sạch máy in 3D; Bộ kit công cụ làm sạch máy in 3D
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti 3D > Kit di pulizia per stampanti 3D: Filamenti per la pulizia della stampante 3D; Fluidi e spray di pulizia per stampanti 3D; Kit di strumenti di pulizia per stampanti 3D
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών 3D > Κιτ καθαρισμού εκτυπωτών 3D: Νήματα καθαρισμού 3D εκτυπωτή; Υγρά & σπρέι καθαρισμού 3D εκτυπωτή; Κιτ εργαλείων καθαρισμού 3D εκτυπωτή
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для 3D-принтеров > Наборы для очистки 3D-принтеров: Чистящие филаменты для 3D-принтеров; Чистящие жидкости и спреи для 3D-принтеров; Наборы чистящих инструментов для 3D-принтеров
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > 3D-tulostimen lisätarvikkeet > 3D-tulostimen puhdistussarjat: 3D-tulostimen puhdistusfilamentti; 3D-tulostimen puhdistusneste ja suihke; 3D-tulostimen puhdistustyökalukokonaisuus
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > 3D-nyomtató-kiegészítők > 3D-nyomtató-tisztítókészletek: 3D-nyomtató tisztítófilamentek; 3D-nyomtató tisztítófolyadékok és spray-k; 3D nyomtató tisztítóeszköz-készletek
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para impresoras 3D > Kits de limpieza para impresoras 3D: Filamentos de limpieza de impresora 3D; Líquidos y aerosoles de limpieza de impresora 3D; Kits de herramientas de limpieza de impresora 3D
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor 3D-printers > Reinigingskits voor 3D-printers: 3d-printer reinigingsfilamenten; 3d-printer reinigingsvloeistoffen en sprays; 3d-printer reinigingstoolkit
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k 3D tlačiarňam > Súpravy na čistenie 3D tlačiarní: Čistiace filamenty pre 3D tlačiarne; Čistiace kvapaliny a spreje pre 3D tlačiarne; Súpravy čistiacich nástrojov pre 3D tlačiarne
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 3D 프린터 부대용품 > 3D 프린터 청소 키트: 3D 프린터 클리닝 필라멘트; 3D 프린터 세정액 및 스프레이; 3D 프린터 클리닝 툴 키트
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > 3Dプリンター関連用品 > 3Dプリンタークリーニングキット: 3Dプリンタークリーニングフィラメント; 3Dプリンタークリーニング液とスプレー; 3Dプリンタークリーニングツールキット
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 3D 打印机配件 > 3D 打印机清洁套件: 3D 打印机清洁丝材; 3D 打印机清洁液和喷剂; 3D 打印机清洁工具套装
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za 3D tiskalnike > Kompleti za čiščenje 3D tiskalnikov: Čistilni filamenti za 3D tiskalnike; Čistilne tekočine in razpršila za 3D tiskalnike; Kompleti čistilnih orodij za 3D tiskalnike
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k 3D tiskárnám > Čistící sady pro 3D tiskárny: Čistící filamenty pro 3D tiskárny; Čistící kapaliny a spreje pro 3D tiskárny; Sady čistících nástrojů pro 3D tiskárny
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante 3D > Seturi de curățare pentru imprimante 3D: Filamente de curățare pentru imprimante 3D; Fluide și sprayuri de curățare pentru imprimante 3D; Kituri de instrumente de curățare pentru imprimante 3D
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til 3D-printere > Rengøringssæt til 3D-printere: 3D-printer – rengøringsfilamenter; 3D-printer – rensevæsker og -sprays; 3D-printer – rengøringsværktøjssæt